Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB857.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 443.13 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended to read:Section 443.13. Emergency Transportation Services.--(a) Subject to Federal approval as may be necessary and contingent on Federal financial participation, from money appropriated for the department under the act of August 3, 2023 (P.L.471, No.1A), known as the General Appropriation Act of 2023, sufficient funds shall be included to provide reimbursement for ground mileage for every loaded mile and to provide the greater of the highest Medicare rates published in the Ambulance Fee Schedule Public Use File for calendar year 2023 or the current Medicaid 123456789101112131415161718 Ambulance Fees as updated by Medical Assistance Bulletin 26-22-07 effective date January 1, 2023, beginning January 1, 2024, for services provided under the Medical Assistance - Fee-for-Service, Medical Assistance - Capitation and Medical Assistance - Community HealthChoices appropriations in the General Appropriation Act of 2023.(b) Beginning July 1, 2025, reimbursement for emergency services for an enrollee that did not require transport or refused to be transported, rendered by a licensed emergency medical services agency shall be the greater of the highest Medicare rates published in the Ambulance Fee Schedule Public Use File for calendar year 2025 or the current Medicaid Ambulance Fees as updated by Medical Assistance Bulletin 26-24-01 effective date January 1, 2024, for services provided under the Medical Assistance - Fee-for-Service, Medical Assistance - Capitation and Medical Assistance - Community HealthChoices appropriations in the act of , 2025 (P.L. , No. ), known as the General Appropriation Act of 2025.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0857PN0895 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819